Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.40.110

Coercion of involuntary servitude.

(1) A person is guilty of coercion of involuntary servitude if he or she coerces, as defined in RCW 9A.36.070, another person to perform labor or services by:

(a) Withholding or threatening to withhold or destroy documents relating to a person's immigration status; or

(b) Threatening to notify law enforcement officials that a person is present in the United States in violation of federal immigration laws.

(2) Coercion does not include reports to law enforcement that a person is present in the United States in violation of federal immigration laws.

(3) A person may commit coercion of involuntary servitude regardless of whether the person provides any sort of compensation or benefits to the person who is coerced.

(4) Coercion of involuntary servitude is a class C felony.

[ 2014 c 52 s 1.]